Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 3. EMPLOYER-EMPLOYEE RELATIONS

CHAPTER 101. LABOR ORGANIZATIONS

SUBCHAPTER A. RIGHTS OF WORKING PERSONS

Sec. 101.001. RIGHT TO ORGANIZE. All persons engaged in any kind of labor may associate and form trade unions and other organizations to protect themselves in their personal labor in their respective employment.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.002. RIGHT TO INFLUENCE ANOTHER REGARDING EMPLOYMENT. (a) A person by peaceful and lawful means may induce or attempt to induce another to:

(1) enter or refuse to enter a particular employment; or

(2) quit a particular employment in which the other person is then engaged.

(b) A member of a trade union or other organization may not enter the premises of another without the consent of the owner of the premises.

(c) This section does not apply to an association formed, an act taken, or an agreement made:

(1) to limit the production, transportation, use, or consumption of labor's products; or

(2) that creates a trust or conspiracy in restraint of trade under the laws of this state.

(d) Subsection (c) does not interfere with the terms of a private contract between an employer and an employee with regard to the time of service or other stipulations.

(e) Subsection (c) may not be construed as repealing or affecting a statute on trusts, conspiracies against trade, pools, or monopolies.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.003. RIGHT TO BARGAIN. A person's inherent right to work and to bargain freely with the person's employer, individually or collectively, for terms of the person's employment may not be denied or infringed by law or by any organization.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.004. CONTRACT FOR WITHHOLDING UNION DUES FROM EMPLOYEE'S COMPENSATION VOID WITHOUT EMPLOYEE'S CONSENT. A contract that permits or requires the retention of part of an employee's compensation to pay dues or assessments on the employee's part to a labor union is void unless the employee delivers to the employer the employee's written consent to the retention of those sums.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER B. RIGHT TO WORK

Sec. 101.051. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "labor union" means an incorporated or unincorporated association, group, union, lodge, local, branch, or subordinate organization of a union of working persons organized and existing to protect those persons and to improve their working conditions, wages, or employment relationships, but does not include an organization not commonly regarded as a labor union.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.052. DENIAL OF EMPLOYMENT BASED ON LABOR UNION MEMBERSHIP PROHIBITED. A person may not be denied employment based on membership or nonmembership in a labor union.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.053. CONTRACT REQUIRING OR PROHIBITING LABOR UNION MEMBERSHIP VOID. A contract is void if it requires that, to work for an employer, employees or applicants for employment:

(1) must be or may not be members of a labor union; or

(2) must remain or may not remain members of a labor union.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER C. REGULATION OF LABOR UNIONS

Sec. 101.101. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Enforcement officer" means the attorney general, district attorney, or county attorney.

(2) "Labor organizer" means a person who for a financial consideration solicits membership in a labor union or members for a labor union.

(3) "Labor union" means an incorporated or unincorporated association, group, union, lodge, local, branch, or subordinate organization of a union of working persons organized and existing to protect those persons and to improve their working conditions, wages, or employment relationships, but does not include an organization not commonly regarded as a labor union.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.102. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS; POLICY. (a) The legislature finds that because the activities of labor unions affect the economic conditions of the country and the state by entering into almost all business and industrial enterprises, labor unions affect the public interest and are charged with a public use.

(b) Workers must be protected without regard to whether they are unionized. The right to work is the right to live.

(c) The policy of this state, in the exercise of its sovereign constitutional police power, is to regulate the activities and affairs of labor unions and officers, agents, organizers, and representatives of labor unions, as provided by this subchapter.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.103. LIBERAL CONSTRUCTION. (a) This subchapter shall be liberally construed to:

(1) achieve the purposes provided by Section 101.102; and

(2) protect the rights of working persons to work and to organize for their mutual benefit in connection with their work.

(b) This subchapter may not be construed to deny the free rights of assembling, bargaining, and petitioning, orally or in writing, regarding a matter affecting labor or employment.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.104. METHOD OF ELECTION OF OFFICERS, AGENTS, ORGANIZERS, AND REPRESENTATIVES. (a) An officer, agent, organizer, or representative of a labor union must be elected by secret ballot and by majority vote of the members present and participating, except as provided by Subsections (b) and (c) and Section 101.108.

(b) A labor union may require more than a majority vote for the election of an officer, agent, organizer, or representative.

(c) A labor union may take a vote of the entire membership for an officer, agent, organizer, or representative by mailed ballots.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.105. ANNUAL ELECTION OF OFFICERS, AGENTS, ORGANIZERS, AND REPRESENTATIVES. An election for labor union officers, agents, organizers, and representatives must be held at least once each year, except as provided by Section 101.108.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.106. NOTICE OF ELECTION. Except as provided by Section 101.108, a labor union shall give members at least seven days' notice of an election under Section 101.105. The notice must be given in the manner most convenient to the union by:

(1) written or printed notice mailed to the member's last known address;

(2) posting notice in a place public to the membership; or

(3) announcement at a regular stated meeting of the union.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.107. RESULTS OF ELECTION. The results of an election held under Section 101.105 shall be determined and declared by the president and the secretary at the time in the presence of the members or delegates participating, except as provided by Section 101.108.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.108. CERTAIN UNIONS EXCEPTED. Sections 101.104-101.107 do not apply to a union that:

(1) under its constitution, bylaws, or other organization rules, held its elections for officers and representatives every three years or every four years, for the four years ending August 10, 1943; and

(2) charged members an initiation fee of $10 or less, for the 10 years ending August 10, 1943.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.109. CERTAIN PERSONS PROHIBITED FROM HOLDING OFFICE. (a) A person may not serve as a labor union officer or as a labor organizer if the person:

(1) is an alien; or

(2) has been convicted of a felony.

(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to a person who has been convicted of a felony and whose rights of citizenship have been fully restored.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.110. LABOR ORGANIZERS; ORGANIZER'S CARD. (a) A labor organizer operating in this state must apply in writing for an organizer's card before soliciting members for the organizer's organization.

(b) An application for an organizer's card must:

(1) be filed with the secretary of state by mail or in person;

(2) state the applicant's full name and labor union affiliations, if any;

(3) describe the applicant's credentials;

(4) be accompanied by a copy of the applicant's credentials; and

(5) be signed by the applicant.

(c) On the filing of an application for an organizer's card, the secretary of state shall issue the applicant a card containing:

(1) the applicant's name;

(2) the applicant's union affiliation;

(3) a space for the applicant's signature;

(4) the designation "labor organizer"; and

(5) the secretary of state's signature, dated and attested by the state seal.

(d) A labor organizer shall:

(1) carry the card issued under Subsection (c) whenever the organizer is soliciting members; and

(2) exhibit the card on request of a person being solicited for membership.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 9.21(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 101.111. FEE FOR PRIVILEGE TO WORK PROHIBITED. (a) A labor union, a labor organizer, or an officer, member, agent, or representative of a labor union may not collect, receive, or demand, directly or indirectly, a fee as a work permit or as a condition for the privilege to work from a person who is not a member of the union.

(b) Subsection (a) does not prevent the collection of an initiation fee as provided by Section 101.113.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.112. EXCESSIVE FEES PROHIBITED. (a) A labor union or an officer, agent, or member of a labor union may not charge or receive initiation fees, dues, fines, or other assessments to create a fund that exceeds the reasonable requirements of the union in carrying out its lawful purposes or activities, if the fees, dues, fines, or other assessments create an undue hardship on an applicant for initiation to the union or on union members.

(b) Subsection (a) may not be construed to prevent dues or other assessments:

(1) for a purpose that is beneficial to union members according to established practice, including the maintenance or investment of funds for those beneficial purposes;

(2) if the members who contribute share in or may reasonably expect to share in the benefits, for:

(A) old age benefits;

(B) death and burial benefits;

(C) hospitalization, unemployment, health and accident, retirement, or other forms of mutual insurance;

(D) legislative representation;

(E) a grievance committee;

(F) gifts, floral offerings, or other charitable purposes; or

(G) any other legitimate purpose; or

(3) for placement in a fund to be used by the union in paying its members while they are on strike, if:

(A) initiation fees are not placed in the fund; and

(B) the fund remains under the members' control.

(c) This section shall be liberally construed to prevent excessive initiation fees.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.113. ADVANCE FEES. (a) On payment in full by an applicant for labor union membership of all initiation fees or dues regularly assessed by the union, the union shall:

(1) elect the applicant to membership; or

(2) immediately return in full the money paid by the applicant.

(b) On election of an applicant to labor union membership, advance fees paid by the applicant may be used by the union for the purposes for which the fees were advanced.

(c) A labor union or an officer, agent, or member of a labor union shall collect all fees in good faith. A labor union may not elect a person to membership merely to obtain the person's initiation fee.

(d) A labor union may not collect an initiation fee from a member and then discharge or suspend the member, or cause the member's employer to discharge the member, without reasonable and just cause.

(e) A labor union that violates Subsection (d) is subject to the civil penalty provided by Section 101.121.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.114. FEE RECEIPT REQUIRED. A labor organizer or an officer, agent, or member of a labor union may not collect a fee, dues, or other sum in connection with membership in a labor union from a person without giving the person at that time a receipt that:

(1) is signed by the labor organizer, officer, agent, or member; and

(2) states that the sum of money received is to be:

(A) delivered to the labor union; and

(B) held intact until the person has been elected and has become a bona fide voting member of the union.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.115. CONSTRUCTION OF FEE RESTRICTIONS. Sections 101.111, 101.113, and 101.114 may not be construed as preventing any type of bargaining agreement or limiting the bargaining power of a labor union.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.116. MEMBER IN ARMED FORCES. A union member who, because of service with the United States armed forces, has been unable to pay any dues or assessment levied by a union to which the member belonged may not be required to make the back payments as a condition to reinstatement in good standing as a member.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.117. REASONABLE TIME FOR DECISION ON MEMBERSHIP REQUIRED. A labor union may not refuse to give a person desiring membership in the union a reasonable time after obtaining the promise of employment in which to decide whether to join the union as a condition of employment.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.118. EXPULSION OF MEMBER. (a) A labor union may not expel a union member without:

(1) good cause; and

(2) a fair and public hearing by and within the organization, after due notice and an opportunity to be heard on the specific charges alleged.

(b) On the petition of a member expelled from a labor organization, a court of competent jurisdiction shall order the reinstatement of the member if the member was expelled without good cause.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.119. RECORDS. (a) Each labor union in this state shall keep accurate books of accounts that:

(1) itemize each receipt from any source;

(2) itemize each expenditure for any purpose; and

(3) state the source of each receipt and the purpose of each expenditure.

(b) A member of a labor union is entitled to inspect the books, records, and accounts of the union at any reasonable time.

(c) The attorney general, or, subject to the attorney general's approval, a district attorney or county attorney, is entitled to inspect on demand the books, records, and accounts of a labor union at any reasonable time.

(d) The books, records, and accounts of a labor union are open to grand juries and judicial and quasi-judicial inquiries in legal proceedings.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.120. REPORTS. A labor union required to file reports with the United States Secretary of Labor under Section 201, Labor-Management Reporting and Disclosure Act of 1959 (29 U.S.C. Section 431) or a successor statute shall file a copy of each report with the secretary of state not later than the 30th day after the date the report was filed with the secretary of labor.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.121. CIVIL PENALTY. A labor union that violates a provision of this subchapter is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 for each violation. The civil penalty may be recovered in the name of the state, acting through an enforcement officer, in a court of competent jurisdiction.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.122. ENFORCEMENT BY CIVIL PROCESS. (a) A district court has jurisdiction, on the application of the state acting through an enforcement officer, to issue a restraining order, a temporary or permanent injunction, or any other writ or process appropriate to enforce this subchapter.

(b) A proceeding under Subsection (a) shall be instituted, prosecuted, and tried in the same manner as another civil case of a similar nature in the district court.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.123. OFFENSE; PENALTY. (a) A labor union officer or a labor organizer commits an offense if the person violates a provision of this subchapter.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by:

(1) a fine of not more than $500;

(2) confinement in the county jail for not more than 60 days; or

(3) both the fine and confinement.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.124. ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS. The attorney general, and each district attorney and county attorney, within the attorney's respective jurisdiction, shall:

(1) prosecute all criminal proceedings under this subchapter; and

(2) institute and maintain all civil proceedings under this subchapter.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER D. PICKETING

Sec. 101.151. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "picketing" includes the stationing of a person for an organization to:

(1) induce anyone not to enter the premises being picketed;

(2) observe the premises being picketed to ascertain who enters or patronizes the premises; or

(3) follow employees or patrons of the premises being picketed to or from those premises to observe them or to attempt to dissuade them from entering or patronizing the premises.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.152. MASS PICKETING PROHIBITED. (a) A person may not engage in any form of picketing activity in which a picket constitutes any character of obstacle to the free ingress to and egress from an entrance to any premises, either by obstructing the free ingress and egress with the person's body or by placing a vehicle or other physical obstruction.

(b) In this section, "picket" includes a person:

(1) stationed by or acting for an organization to:

(A) induce anyone not to enter the premises being picketed; or

(B) observe the premises being picketed to ascertain who enters or patronizes the premises; or

(2) who follows employees or patrons of the premises being picketed to or from those premises to observe them or to attempt to dissuade them from entering or patronizing the premises.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.153. USE OF INSULTING, THREATENING, OR OBSCENE LANGUAGE PROHIBITED. A person may not, by use of insulting, threatening, or obscene language, interfere with or intimidate or seek to interfere with or intimidate another:

(1) in the exercise of the other person's lawful right to work or to enter on the performance of a lawful vocation; or

(2) from freely entering or leaving any premises.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.154. PICKETING INTENDED TO SECURE BREACH OF LABOR AGREEMENT PROHIBITED. A person may not engage in picketing the purpose of which, directly or indirectly, is to secure the disregard or breach of a valid existing labor agreement arrived at between an employer and the representatives:

(1) designated by the employees for the purpose of collective bargaining; or

(2) certified as the bargaining unit under the National Labor Relations Act (29 U.S.C. Section 151 et seq.).

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.155. DECLARATION OR PUBLICATION OF CONTINUATION OF ENJOINED PICKETING PROHIBITED. A person may not declare or publicize the continued existence of actual or constructive picketing at a point or directed against a premises after a court of competent jurisdiction has enjoined the continuation of that picketing at that point or premises.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.156. OFFENSE; PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person violates Section 101.152, 101.153, 101.154, or 101.155. Each separate act of violation constitutes a separate offense.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by:

(1) a fine of not less than $25 nor more than $500;

(2) confinement in jail for not more than 90 days; or

(3) both the fine and confinement.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER E. SECONDARY PICKETING

Sec. 101.201. SECONDARY PICKETING PROHIBITED. (a) A person may not establish, call, participate in, or aid picketing at or near the premises of an employer with whom a labor dispute does not exist.

(b) In this section:

(1) "Employee" includes any person working for another for hire in this state, but does not include an independent contractor.

(2) "Employer" means any person who engages the services of an employee.

(3) "Labor dispute" means a controversy concerning wages, hours, or conditions of employment between an employer and employees. A controversy is not a labor dispute if the employees do not have a real and substantial economic interest in the work performed for the employer.

(4) "Picket" includes a person:

(A) stationed by or acting in behalf of an organization to:

(i) induce anyone not to enter the premises being picketed;

(ii) apprise the public by signs or other means of the existence of a labor dispute at or near the premises being picketed; or

(iii) observe the premises being picketed to ascertain who enters or patronizes the premises; or

(B) who follows employees or patrons of the premises being picketed to or from those premises to observe them or to attempt to dissuade them from entering or patronizing the premises.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.202. OFFENSE; PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person violates any provision of this subchapter.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by:

(1) a fine of not more than $500;

(2) confinement in the county jail for not more than six months; or

(3) both the fine and confinement.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.203. CIVIL LIABILITY. (a) A person who violates any provision of this subchapter is liable to a person damaged by the violation for the damages resulting from the violation.

(b) A person damaged by a violation of this subchapter may maintain an action to redress the damage and may obtain injunctive relief.

(c) An association or labor union that represents or purports to represent a person who violates any provision of this subchapter is jointly and severally liable with the person for the damages resulting from the violation.

(d) In this section, "labor union" means any incorporated or unincorporated association, group, union, national or local, branch, or subordinate organization of a union of working persons organized and existing in part to protect those persons and to improve their working conditions, wages, or employment relationships and includes the local, state, national, and international affiliates of those organizations.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.204. ENFORCEMENT. The state, acting through the attorney general or a district attorney or county attorney, may institute a suit in district court to enjoin a person from violating this subchapter.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.205. VENUE. Venue for a suit or cause of action arising under this subchapter is in:

(1) the county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred;

(2) the county in which the defendant resides; or

(3) if there are two or more defendants, a county in which any defendant resides.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER F. LIABILITY OF LABOR ORGANIZATION FOR DAMAGES

Sec. 101.251. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Labor organization" means any organization in which employees participate and that exists in whole or in part to deal with one or more employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, hours of employment, or working conditions.

(2) "Picketing" includes the stationing of a person for an organization to:

(A) induce anyone not to enter the premises being picketed;

(B) apprise the public by signs or other means of the existence of a dispute;

(C) observe the premises being picketed to ascertain who enters or patronizes the premises; or

(D) follow employees or patrons of the premises being picketed to or from those premises to observe them or to attempt to dissuade them from entering or patronizing the premises.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 101.252. LIABILITY OF LABOR ORGANIZATION. A labor organization whose members picket or strike against a person is liable for damages for a loss resulting to the person because of the picketing or strike if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the picketing or strike is a breach of contract.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER G. INTERFERENCE WITH RIGHT TO WORK

Sec. 101.301. INTERFERENCE WITH RIGHT TO WORK; LIABILITY. (a) The right of a person to work may not be denied or abridged because of membership or nonmembership in a labor union or other labor organization.

(b) In the exercise of the right to work, each person shall be free from threats, force, intimidation, or coercion.

(c) A person who violates this subchapter is liable to a person who suffers from that violation for all resulting damages.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 9.22, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 101.302. INJUNCTIVE RELIEF. (a) The attorney general or a district or county attorney may bring an action in district court to enjoin a violation of this subchapter.

(b) The district courts shall grant injunctive relief when a violation of this subchapter is made apparent.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 9.22, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 101.303. ASSIGNMENT OF DISTRICT JUDGE. Not later than the second day after the receipt of notice of institution of a cause of action under this subchapter, a party to the cause of action may apply to the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region within which the action is brought. The presiding judge shall immediately assign a district judge from within the administrative judicial region who shall hear all proceedings in the cause of action.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 9.22, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.